Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,197
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to establish and maintain a procedure to set off against a debtor's income tax refund any debt owed to the Department of Labor which has accrued as a result of an individual's liability for the repayment of unemployment insurance benefits determined to be in overpayment pursuant to sections 48-665 and 48-665.01 or an employer's liability for combined tax determined to be due and owing pursuant to sections 48-655 and 48-656.

Laws 1993, LB 46, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 129, § 3.